Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2660YH (1) 91 sc/js H.F. 468 Section 1. Section 1B.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 1B.3 Flags on public buildings. 3 1. It shall be the duty of any A board of public officers 4 charged with providing supplies for a public building in the 5 state to shall provide a suitable state flag , and it shall be 6 the duty of the custodian of that public building to shall 7 raise the flags of the United States of America and the state 8 of Iowa , upon each secular day when weather conditions are 9 favorable. 10 2. The national league of families POW/MIA flag shall be 11 flown at all state-owned buildings in accordance with federal 12 rules whenever the flag of the United States of America is 13 flown. 14